Rhode Island statutes. Title 16 Education
Chapter 49 Board of Regents for Education [Repealed.]

16-49-1 — 16-49-17.
Repealed.

History of Section.

G.L. 1956, §§

16-49-1

, 16-49-3 — 16-49-9,

16-49-1

3 — 16-49-20; P.L. 1969, ch. 231, §§ 3, 12, 13, 15; P.L. 1970, ch. 298, § 1; P.L. 1971, ch. 13, § 1; P.L. 1956, §§ 16-49-2 — 16-49-17; P.L. 1973, ch. 249, § 1; P.L. 1974, ch. 223, § 1; P.L. 1975, ch. 253, § 1; P.L. 1976, ch. 130, §§ 7, 8; P.L. 1976, ch. 198, art. 1, § 13; P.L. 1977, ch. 118, § 1; P.L. 1977, ch. 262, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 205, art. 5, § 1; P.L. 1978, ch. 372, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 174, art. 9, § 1; P.L. 1979, ch. 390, § 1; P.L. 1980, ch. 146, § 1; Repealed by P.L. 1981, ch. 32, § 14. For the effective date of the repeal, see § 14 of P.L. 1981, ch. 32, which provides in part: “effective with the filing of certified copies of the order or orders of reorganization by the board of governors for higher education and the board of regents for elementary and secondary education in the office of the secretary of state, ch. 16-49 entitled ‘board of regents for education’ excepting only such provisions as are herein expressly provided shall stand repealed.” For present provisions of law, see §§

16-59-1

et seq.,

16-60-1

et seq., and

16-61-1

et seq.

16-49-18 — 16-49-20.
[Transferred.]